District of Columbia statutes.
21-143

Duties; accounts; maintenance and education; sales; compensation.

A guardian shall manage the estate for the best interests of the ward, and once in each year, or oftener if required, he shall settle an account of his trust under oath. He shall account for all profit and increase of his ward’s estate and the annual value thereof, and shall be allowed credit for taxes, repairs, improvements, expenses, and commissions, and he is not answerable for any loss or decrease sustained without his fault. The court shall determine the amounts to be expended annually in the maintenance and education of the infant, regard being had to his future condition and prospects in life; and if it deems it advantageous to the ward, may allow the guardian to exceed the income of the estate and to make use of the principal and sell it or part thereof, under the court’s order, as provided by this subchapter; but a guardian may not sell any property of his ward without an order of the court previously had therefor. The court shall allow a reasonable compensation for services rendered by the guardian not exceeding a commission of five per centum of the amounts collected, if and when disbursed.

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 741, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
Capacity of minor to contract for life, health, and accident insurance, see § 31-4330.
Care for minor children, failure to provide, see §§ 22-1101 and 22-1102.
Child labor and work permits, see § 32-201 et seq.
Consent to marriage of minor, see § 46-411.
Enforcement of personal property taxes by distraint or levy, see § 47-1601.
Real estate leases involving minors, see § 42-3225 et seq.
Tax sale redemption rights of minors, see § 47-1304.
1981 Ed., § 21-143.
1973 Ed., § 21-143.